New York, session 2025-2026, S3858.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 3000-c of the 2 public health law, as amended by chapter 472 of the laws of 2024, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (a) "Eligible person or entity" means: (i) an ambulance service or 5 advanced life support first response service; a certified first respon- 6 der, firefighter in a county, city, town or village having a population 7 of less than two million provided such county is not wholly located 8 within a city with a population of more than one million, emergency 9 medical technician, or advanced emergency medical technician, who is 10 employed by or an enrolled member of any such service; (ii) [a chil- 11 dren's overnight camp as defined in subdivision one of section thirteen 12 hundred ninety-two of this chapter, a summer day camp as defined in 13 subdivision two of section thirteen hundred ninety-two of this chapter, 14 a traveling summer day camp as defined in subdivision three of section 15 thirteen hundred ninety-two of this chapter or a person employed by such 16 a camp; (iii)] a school district, board of cooperative educational 17 services, county vocational education and extension board, charter 18 school, and non-public elementary and secondary school in this state or 19 any person employed by any such entity, or employed by a contractor of 20 such an entity while performing services for the entity; [(iv)] (iii) a 21 sports, entertainment, amusement, education, government, day care or 22 retail facility; an educational institution, youth organization or 23 sports league; an establishment that serves food; or a person employed 24 by such entity; [(v)] (iv) a police officer or peace officer in a coun- 25 ty, city, town or village having a population of less than two million 26 provided such county is not wholly located within a city with a popu- 27 lation of more than one million; [(vi)] (v) forest rangers, park rangers EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00948-01-5 S. 3858 2 1 and environmental conservation police officers; [and (vii)] or (vi) any 2 other person or entity designated or approved, or in a category desig- 3 nated or approved pursuant to regulations of the commissioner in consul- 4 tation with other appropriate agencies. 5 § 2. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 1392-b 6 to read as follows: 7 § 1392-b. Epinephrine devices required. 1. Definitions. As used in 8 this section, "emergency health care provider" means (a) a physician 9 with knowledge and experience in the delivery of emergency care; or (b) 10 a hospital licensed under article twenty-eight of this chapter that 11 provides emergency care. 12 2. Collaborative agreement. (a) Every person, firm, limited liability 13 company, association and corporation which operates a children's over- 14 night, summer day and traveling summer day camp, as defined in this 15 article, shall maintain a collaborative agreement with an emergency 16 health care provider and shall have on the premises an epinephrine 17 device. 18 (b) The collaborative agreement required pursuant to paragraph (a) of 19 this subdivision shall include a written agreement that incorporates 20 written practice protocols, and policies and procedures that shall 21 ensure compliance with the provisions of this section. The person, firm, 22 limited liability company, organization or entity operating the chil- 23 dren's overnight, summer day and traveling summer day camp shall file a 24 copy of the collaborative agreement with the department and with the 25 appropriate regional council prior to using any epinephrine device. 26 3. Possession and use of epinephrine devices. Possession and use of 27 epinephrine devices shall be limited as follows: 28 (a) No person shall use an epinephrine device unless such person shall 29 have successfully completed a training course in the use of epinephrine 30 devices approved by the commissioner pursuant to the rules of the 31 department. This section does not prohibit the use of an epinephrine 32 device (i) by a health care practitioner licensed or certified under 33 title eight of the education law acting within the scope of such practi- 34 tioner's practice, or (ii) by a person acting pursuant to a lawful 35 prescription. 36 (b) Every person, firm, organization and entity authorized to possess 37 and use epinephrine devices pursuant to this section shall use, maintain 38 and dispose of such devices pursuant to regulations of the department. 39 (c) Every use of an epinephrine device pursuant to this section shall 40 immediately be reported to the emergency health care provider. 41 4. Application of other laws. (a) Use of an epinephrine device pursu- 42 ant to this section shall be considered first aid or emergency treatment 43 for the purpose of any statute relating to liability. 44 (b) Purchase, acquisition, possession or use of an epinephrine device 45 pursuant to this section shall not constitute the unlawful practice of a 46 profession or other violation under title eight of the education law or 47 article thirty-three of this chapter. 48 (c) Any person otherwise authorized to sell or provide an epinephrine 49 device may sell or provide it to a person authorized to possess it 50 pursuant to this section. 51 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 52 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 53 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 54 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 55 completed on or before such effective date.